Tennessee, session 114, SB0089.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-246(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (43).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-252(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Tennessee claims commission, created by § 9-8-301;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0089
000348
- 1 -